Wisconsin, session 2025, AB267.
do enact as follows:AB267,13Section 1. 27.01 (9) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB267,2,2427.01 (9) (b) Earth Day fee waiver. The department shall waive any daily fee 5for admission to a state park imposed under sub. (7) or (8), including any issuing fee, 1on April 22 of each year in commemoration of Earth Day and its founder, Gaylord 2Nelson.AB267,2,33